test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-wicih_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - wîcih - help : # Ordinary TA verb - full paradigm
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: niwîcihâw
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kiwîcihâw
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3SgO: wîcihêw
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+3SgO: wîcihêyiwa

     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: niwîcihânân
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kiwîcihânaw
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kiwîcihâwâw
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3SgO: wîcihêwak
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Pl+3SgO: wîcihêyiwa

     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: niwîcihâwak
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: kiwîcihâwak
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3PlO: wîcihêw
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+3PlO: wîcihêyiwa
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+4PlO: wîcihikoyiwa

     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: niwîcihânânak
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: kiwîcihânawak
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: kiwîcihâwâwak
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3PlO: wîcihêwak
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Pl+3PlO: wîcihêyiwa

     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: niwîcihik
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: kiwîcihik
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: niwîcihikonân
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: kiwîcihikonaw
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: kiwîcihikowâw
     
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: niwîcihikwak
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: kiwîcihikwak
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: niwîcihikonânak
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: kiwîcihikonawak
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: kiwîcihikowâwak
     
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: [ê-wîcihak, êwîcihak]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: [ê-wîcihakik, êwîcihakik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: [ê-wîcihâyâhk, êwîcihâyâhk]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: [ê-wîcihâyâhkik, êwîcihâyâhkik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: [ê-wîcihâyahk, êwîcihâyahk]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: [ê-wîcihâyâhkok, êwîcihâyâhkok]

     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: [ê-wîcihat, êwîcihat]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: [ê-wîcihacik, êwîcihacik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: [ê-wîcihâyêk, êwîcihâyêk]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: [ê-wîcihâyêkok, êwîcihâyêkok]

     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: [ê-wîcihicik, êwîcihicik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyâhkik, êwîcihikoyâhkik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyâhkok, êwîcihikoyâhkok]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: [ê-wîcihiskik, êwîcihiskik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyêkok, êwîcihikoyêkok]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+3SgO: [ê-wîcihâcik, êwîcihâcik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+3PlO: [ê-wîcihâcik, êwîcihâcik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4PlO: [ê-wîcihikocik, êwîcihikocik]

     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4PlO: [ê-wîcihikocik, êwîcihikocik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+3SgO: [ê-wîcihât, êwîcihât]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+3PlO: [ê-wîcihât, êwîcihât]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: [ê-wîcihisk, êwîcihisk]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyêk, êwîcihikoyêk]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: [ê-wîcihit, êwîcihit]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyâhk, êwîcihikoyâhk]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyahk, êwîcihikoyahk]

     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Pl+4SgO: [ê-wîcihkoyit, êwîcihkoyit]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Pl+4PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyit, êwîcihikoyit]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Pl+3SgO: [ê-wîcihâyit, êwîcihâyit]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Pl+3PlO: [ê-wîcihikocik, êwîcihikocik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+4SgO: [ê-wîcihkoyit, êwîcihkoyit]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+4PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyit, êwîcihikoyit]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+3SgO: [ê-wîcihâyit, êwîcihâyit]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+3PlO: [ê-wîcihikocik, êwîcihikocik]


     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3SgO: wîcihaki
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3PlO: wîcihakwâwi
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3SgO: wîcihâyâhki
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3PlO: wîcihâyâhkwâwi
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3SgO: wîcihâyâhko
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3PlO: wîcihâyâhkwâwi
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3SgO: wîcihaci
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3PlO: wîcihatwâwi
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3SgO: wîcihâyêko
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3PlO: wîcihâyêkwâwi
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+3SgO: wîcihâci
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+4SgO: wîcihâyici
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+3PlO: wîcihikotwâwi
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1SgO: wîcihici
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2SgO: wîcihiski
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1PlO: wîcihikoyâhki
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2PlO: wîcihikoyêko
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+12PlO: wîcihikoyahko
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+3SgO: wîcihâtwâwi
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+3PlO: wîcihâtwâwi
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg+3SgO: wîcihikoci
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg+3PlO: wîcihâyici
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Pl+3SgO: wîcihikoci
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Pl+3PlO: wîcihâyici
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg+4PlO: wîcihikoyici
     wîcih+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Pl+4PlO: wîcihikoyici

     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: wîcih
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: wîcihihk
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO: wîcihâtân

     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: wîcihik
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: wîcihihkok
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO: wîcihâtânik

     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: wîcihâhkan
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: wîcihâhkêk
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: wîcihâhkahk

     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: wîcihâhkanik
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: wîcihâhkêkok
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO: wîcihâhkahkok
